output_dics/Compressed_dics/es_WAKFU/es_WAKFU.dic
abrakno/GS
Abrakno/GS
Abráknido/GS
abráknido/GS
Abuelito/G
abuelito/G
Achú/S
acuñadora/S
Acuñadora/S
adoctwinado/S
Afrutado/G
afrutado/G
Albatroz/S
albatroz/S
Algodonudo/S
algodonudo/S
All/G
Almanicha/S
almanicha/S
alte/G
amakneana/S
amakneano/GS
Amalanto/S
amanita/S
Amanita/S
and/GS
And/GS
aniripsa/S
Aniripsa/S
Ankafiliado/G
Anto/G
anutrof/S
Anutrof/S
anutrofa/S
Arakna/S
arakna/S
Araknoplasma/S
araknoplasma/S
Araknoshima/S
araknoshima/S
arcaológica/S
arcaológico/GS
arcaólogo/GS
Arcaólogo/GS
Archimonstruo/S
archimonstruo/S
Arenóptero/GS
arenóptero/GS
Armand/G
aráknida/S
aráknido/G
Astracacia/S
astracacia/S
astrubiense/S
Avalancho/G
avalancho/G
Awelito/G
awelito/G
Bal/G
balí/S
Balí/S
Bamga/S
bamga/S
Bamgarón/S
bamgarón/S
bananaranja/S
Bananaranja/S
bananaranjo/GS
Bananaranjo/GS
Barquito/S
barquito/S
bastoncito/S
Bastoncito/S
belle/G
Belíade/S
belíade/S
Berserkofóbico/G
Bicéfalo/GS
Bilby-platina/S
bilby-platina/S
bilbycenca/S
bilbycenco/GS
bilbyzarro/S
blandito/G
Blop/S
blop/S
Bobola/S
bolsita/S
Bolsita/S
bolístero/G
bontariana/S
bontariano/GS
boo/S
Boo/S
Booleto/S
booleto/S
Booskito/S
booskito/S
Boost/S
Brakmariana/S
brakmariana/S
brakmariano/GS
Brick/S
Brizlona/S
brizlona/S
brizlón/GS
Brizlón/GS
Buhatrás/S
buhatrás/S
Buhocarga/S
Bulbomatorral/S
bulbomatorral/S
Bulldaga/S
bulldaga/S
Bwork/S
bwork/S
Bworkbolero/S
bworkbolero/S
Caballewo/S
caballewo/S
cacterra/S
Cacterra/S
Cacterro/GS
cacterro/GS
cactifloro/GS
Cactifloro/GS
Cactoblongo/S
cactoblongo/S
cactoso/S
Cactoso/S
cajita/S
Cajita/S
calawaza/S
Calawaza/S
calawazado/S
Calawazadow/S
cangwejo/S
Cangwejo/S
caniofaro/S
Caniofaro/S
cantarín/GS
Carisclimático/G
Carlo/S
Catacumba/S
Celestiano/G
chalarcoso/S
Chalarcoso/S
Chaloca/S
chaloca/S
chamana/S
champiñón/S
Champiñón/S
Chapoteador/G
chapoteador/G
Charcosa/S
charcosa/S
charcoso/GS
Charcoso/GS
cherniego/G
Cherniego/G
chusmerluza/S
Chusmerluza/S
cienciomago/S
Cocoburio/G
Coflauta/S
coflauta/S
Cofwe/S
cofwe/S
Conjurador/G
conjurador/G
consewvada/S
corbot/S
Corbot/S
cornelado/G
crafteador/S
Cristoscuro/S
Crujelado/G
Crujibola/S
crujibola/S
crujidor/S
Crujidor/S
crurazón/S
Crurazón/S
Crustarisco/S
crustarisco/S
crózoli/S
Cubrecabeza/S
cubrecabeza/S
Cuerbakesino/S
cuerbakesino/S
cuerbok/S
Cuerbok/S
Cultista/S
Cunejo/S
cunejo/S
cuático/S
demoniaca/S
Demorrible/S
demorrible/S
desincronizado/S
Desmantelador/G
desregulada/S
Dextrógiro/G
Deyección/S
Dine/G
discotequero/G
docero/GS
Dracónica/S
dracónica/S
dracónico/G
Dracónico/G
Dragocarpa/S
dragocarpa/S
dragohuevo/S
Dragohuevo/S
Dragonizador/G
dragopavo/S
Dragopavo/S
Drop/S
drop/S
dulzamargo/S
ectoplasma/S
Embrialma/S
embrialma/S
emote/S
encantártaro/S
Encantártaro/S
Enewgía/S
enewgía/S
enmasquelado/G
Epicutícula/S
epicutícula/S
Equipable/S
esbirrio/GS
Esbirrio/GS
Escaparazón/S
escapatarazón/S
Escapatarazón/S
escarabela/S
Escarabela/S
escarado/G
Escarado/G
Escarahoja/S
escarahoja/S
escaramelo/S
Escaramelo/S
escaramosca/S
Escaramosca/S
escorpico/S
Escorpico/S
Escuadrita/S
escuadrita/S
Escuama/S
escuama/S
Eskualo/S
eskualo/S
Espadazo/S
espantacuerbok/S
Espantacuerbok/S
espantrotapájaro/S
Espantrotapájaro/S
especiado/G
Espinante/G
esporulador/G
Espórula/S
eufobia/S
Eufobia/S
Excarnado/GS
excarnado/GS
Fab'hurita/S
fab'hurita/S
fab'huritesca/S
Fab'huritesca/S
fab'huritu/S
Fab'huritu/S
Fallecinerado/S
fallecinerado/S
Fardón/G
feca/S
ferocirraptor/S
Fisurado/G
fitoforme/S
Flambeado/GS
forgelado/G
forjalanza/S
Forjamartillo/S
Fotasma/S
Fragilizado/G
fragmonita/S
frigosteño/GS
Frigosteño/GS
Frizziruleta/S
Fúngica/S
Fúngico/G
Game/G
ganva/S
Gargólico/G
Gastrónomo/GS
Gatarrastrero/S
Gelutín/S
Gerbilinda/S
geta/S
ghul/S
glalito/S
glalí/S
glucídico/S
goldo/S
Gostofo/S
gostoplasma/S
Grala/S
grápula/S
gualdia/S
guawdia/S
Gugu/S
guáter/S
Gólem/S
Güino/S
haiku/S
Helaventurero/G
Hipermago/GS
hipermago/GS
hispáÑico/G
Histólico/GS
Hole/G
Howa/S
Hudo/G
Huesito/S
Humán/G
Härenosa/S
Härenoso/GS
Implosión/G
Infinite/G
interdimensional/S
itán/G
Jabatillo/S
Jalabola/S
jalabolista/S
Jalalínea/S
Jalatín/S
Jalató/S
jalrogín/S
jefesú/S
Jorra/S
Justiciólogo/G
Jálrog/S
kakón/G
kama/S
kanibolasombra/S
kaníbola/S
kanívora/S
kanívoro/GS
kar/G
Kar/G
kaskarlusco/GS
Kaso/G
Kasrakol/S
Kate/G
Kiryuk/S
Kitsu/S
koko/S
kokoko/S
kokotero/S
kolgado/GS
Kolgado/GS
koral/S
kralamar/S
krósmico/G
Krósmico/G
Kturno/G
Kuakuá/S
kutulú/S
lación/S
Lametazo/S
Land/G
Lanzarle/G
lanzarle/G
larvesca/S
larvesco/G
Leleche/S
lewdo/G
Liano/G
Llamilla/S
Luciseta/S
Lugaweño/S
Lápido/G
macabrasivo/G
maginífico/G
Magmática/S
Magmático/G
magmático/G
makafé/S
Mamapinxo/S
Mantra/S
mariscook/S
marroquinero/GS
Marroquinero/GS
Maxilubo/G
maxilubo/G
Mediomuerta/S
Mediomuerto/GS
mediomuerto/GS
meka/S
Mekarbok/S
mekánica/S
mekánico/GS
Melómano/GS
mensäje/S
Mento/G
Mer/G
merkagema/S
merkambiente/S
Merkamundo/S
Merkasako/S
Metamorfo/S
Miaumiau/S
Microbot/S
micófago/G
miluba/S
milubo/GS
Milubo/GS
milujustado/G
Mimic/S
Miminilubo/S
Mimito/S
Mimut/S
Miniblop/S
minibrizlón/S
minilubo/S
minimaxilubo/S
monáwquico/S
Mordeduro/GS
mordeduro/GS
Moskito/S
Mowdisqueado/G
mowdisqueado/G
Muduro/S
Muewte/G
murciego/GS
Murciego/GS
muuugresa/S
Muuugritón/S
Muuumusca/S
Móguiz/S
Mówbido/S
namo/S
nawanja/S
necroforjado/G
necromizada/S
necromizado/G
Necromizador/G
necropedo/G
necrómica/S
Necrómico/G
necrómico/G
negraspora/S
negwo/G
Negwo/G
Neoarmero/G
Neoartesano/G
Neocampesino/G
Neococinero/G
Neocorrupción/S
Neoexterminador/G
Neogobernador/G
Neoherbolario/G
Neojefe/S
Neojoyero/G
Neoleñador/G
Neomaestro/G
Neominero/G
Neomonje/S
Neopanadero/G
Neopeletero/G
Neopescador/G
Neorrecolector/G
Neorrecompensa/S
Neosalvador/G
Neotrabajador/G
nievaja/S
nipinza/S
Nobeño/S
Norme/G
Noxaraña/S
Noxbriz/S
noxina/S
nozdekoko/S
Nécromo/GS
nécromo/GS
ocra/S
Ogrestminator/G
Omeboide/S
Ondo/G
Orichalcum/S
Oruego/GS
Oscha/S
oseásmico/GS
Oseásmico/GS
pack/S
Palmerita/S
pandawa/S
pandawan/S
pandisidente/S
papagucán/S
Pas/S
pataleto/G
Pataleto/G
Patapikot/S
patapinxo/S
patita/S
Pekatcham/S
pelopluma/S
peludito/G
Perforatroz/S
perfosa/S
perfoso/GS
Pescaluna/S
Pestombrero/G
pestombrero/G
Pestruz/GS
pestruz/GS
Pestruza/S
pestruzillo/S
pestruzo/G
Pestruzo/G
Pewfowatwoz/S
pezgajoso/S
picahoso/G
Pikopik/S
pilluelo/S
Pinchito/S
Pioafe/S
Piolina/S
pirañaña/S
Piruleta/S
Pischiseado/G
Pizzarva/S
Plaguepardo/S
planctón/S
plantala/S
Plantiguardia/S
Plisionelo/S
podwida/S
pohoyo/S
Polterizado/G
prespic/S
Primacizo/S
primaniola/S
Pseudópodo/S
puerroculto/S
Pulguita/S
Pulprofundo/S
pwohibido/G
Píombrero/G
píombrero/G
Pútwida/S
Pútwido/G
Ramapata/S
Rastrejón/S
ratató/S
Ratuesa/S
Recicladora/S
Recongelado/G
refunfuñón/G
Regenerativo/G
rematador/G
Remendador/G
reptiliano/G
Repurgador/G
repurgador/G
rhizoma/S
riape/S
Roñoso/G
rácano/S
Sabanastral/S
Sacrógrito/GS
sacrógrito/GS
sadida/S
saglado/GS
Sakura/S
salamón/S
samaraciosa/S
samaracioso/G
Samaracioso/G
Sedentor/S
seveR/G
Sevicia/S
shamánica/S
shamánico/GS
Shamánico/GS
Slip/S
snoofle/S
Solgazán/S
sombrijuelo/S
sram/S
Sramvillano/GS
stasiada/S
stasiado/GS
Stasiado/GS
Stasificador/G
steamela/S
Suertudo/G
sufokeño/GS
Super/GS
superglú/S
superglús/S
superpoderosa/S
Superpoderoso/GS
Supervillano/S
surfero/GS
Surimi/S
Susurrastreador/S
susurrona/S
Susurrín/G
susurrín/G
Susurrón/G
susurrón/G
susutraidor/S
sámara/S
tabi/S
taharta/S
taponano/GS
tatorbellino/S
tecnomágico/GS
Tejaroxor/GS
tejaroxor/GS
tejoso/S
Teletransportación/S
telúrica/S
Telúrico/G
Terronita/S
testikui/S
Tigri/S
titanohuevo/S
tofona/S
tofu/S
Tofullero/G
Topinambo/S
Toriano/G
Tortúmulo/S
Trabador/G
Troolero/G
Troolesco/GS
troolesco/GS
Tropikoko/S
Truchatún/S
Tsu/S
turhistérico/S
Tymador/GS
tymador/GS
tómico/G
uginak/S
Ugipcio/S
valquíride/S
vampyro/S
vampírico/G
vampýrica/S
vandalienado/S
verdutante/S
Wabbit/S
wauwau/S
weal/S
webelde/S
Weina/S
Wey/S
Wobot/S
wobótico/G
Wodo/S
Wok/S
wonejo/S
Wábano/S
Xelot/S
yokai/S
Yopuka/S
Zaap/S
Zanaholia/S
zanahowia/S
Zanahowio/GS
zanahowio/GS
zespadín/S
Zircometa/S
zolla/S
zollo/GS
Zollo/GS
zombbit/S
Zone/GS
Zono/G
zurcarák/S
zurikato/S
époque/G
éterno/GS
Éterno/GS
ñiamzama/S
Ñiamzamo/GS
ñiamzamo/GS
